Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 8. Fort Fred Steele State Park

§ 36-8-801.
Declaration of area as Fort Fred Steele state historic site; administration; safety facilities.

The lands in Carbon county managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 and known as the Fort Fred Steele area are hereby declared to be a state historic site. The department shall by rule specify the legal description of the site.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 11, § 3.

The department of state parks and cultural resources shall administer this area providing for the best possible state historic site, and it shall be the responsibility of the department to provide all reasonable and necessary safety facilities made necessary by reason of the increased hazards resulting from the establishing of a state park adjacent to, and on both sides of, Union Pacific Railroad Company’s main line right-of-way and tracks. These safety facilities shall include, but are not limited to, such fencing of Union Pacific Railroad Company’s main line right-of-way as is reasonably necessary to prevent access by the general public to such right-of-way; some type of pedestrian walkway through the grade separation to provide pedestrian access between the south and north sides of the site; and either the closing of the Fort Steele grade crossing to the general public or the establishment at said crossing of grade crossing protection devices consisting of flasher lights and gates. The department is hereby authorized to enter into agreements with Union Pacific Railroad Company relative to the department’s providing such reasonable and necessary safety facilities. In the event the department and Union Pacific Railroad Company are unable to so agree, the public service commission of Wyoming shall determine what reasonable and necessary safety facilities shall be provided by the department at Fort Fred Steele state historic site, upon application filed with the public service commission of Wyoming by either Union Pacific Railroad Company or the department. These necessary and reasonable safety facilities shall be constructed before the opening of the Fort Fred Steele state historic site to the public.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 236, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-180.20; Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2010, ch. 11, §§ 2, 3.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a) inserted “managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 and,” substituted “are hereby declared to be a state historic site” for “described as follows are hereby declared to be a historical state park,” and added the last sentence; repealed former (a)(i) through (a)(iii) which described statutory legal descriptions; in (b) substituted “state historic site” for “historical state park” or variants throughout, and substituted “Fort Fred Steele state” for “Fort Steele state” twice.